Alaska statutes. Title 47. Welfare, Social Services, and Institutions.
Article 6. General Provisions.

Sec. 47.14.980.
Grants-in-aid.

The department may accept grants-in-aid from the federal government or private foundations and may accept other gifts consistent with the purposes of this chapter.

History.

(§ 47 ch 59 SLA 1996)

Sec. 47.14.990.
Definitions.

In this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires,

“care” or “caring” under AS

47.14.100(c)

means to provide for the physical, emotional, mental, and social needs of the child;

“child in need of aid” means a child found to be within the jurisdiction of the court under AS

47.10.010

and

47.10.011

;

“court” means the superior court of the state;

“criminal justice information” has the meaning given in AS

12.62.900

;

“delinquent minor” means a minor found to be within the jurisdiction of the court under AS

47.12.020

;

“department” means the Department of Health and Social Services;

“juvenile detention facility” has the meaning given in AS

47.12.990

;

“juvenile probation officer” has the meaning given in AS

47.12.990

;

“juvenile treatment facility” has the meaning given in AS

47.12.990

;

“minor” has the meaning given in AS

47.12.990

;

“temporary secure juvenile holding area” has the meaning given in AS

47.12.990

;

“treatment institution” means a hospital, clinic, institution, center, or other health care facility that has been designated by the department for the treatment of juveniles.

History.

(§ 47 ch 59 SLA 1996; am §§ 55, 56 ch 99 SLA 1998; am §§ 73, 82 ch 41 SLA 2009; am §§ 52 — 54, 56 ch 16 SLA 2021)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1998, 2016, and 2021, the paragraphs in this section were renumbered to maintain alphabetical order.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2009 amendment, effective June 21, 2009, repealed (11), which read, “ ‘serious offense’ has the meaning given in AS

12.62.900

;”; and in (12), deleted “ ‘Treatment facility’ or” preceding “ ‘treatment institution’ ”.

The 2021 amendment, effective July 9, 2021, in (7), substituted “has the meaning given in AS

47.12.990

” for “means separate quarters within a city jail used for the detention of delinquent minors”; repealed former (8) and (9); in (10), substituted “has the meaning given in AS

47.12.990

” for “means a person under 18 years of age”; added (12) – (14) [now (8), (9), and (11)].